th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > วัสดุก่อสร้าง > อุปกรณ์หน้าต่าง > กรอบหน้าต่าง: กรอบหน้าต่างบานกระทุ้ง; กรอบหน้าต่างบานเปิด; กรอบหน้าต่างบานเลื่อนคู่; กรอบหน้าต่างแบบชมวิว; กรอบหน้าต่างบานเลื่อน
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Строительные изделия > Оконная фурнитура > Оконные рамы: Рамы для верхнеподвесных окон; Рамы для распашных окон; Рамы для двустворчатых подъемных окон; Рамы для панорамных окон; Рамы для раздвижных окон
sk-SK: Náradie > Stavebné materiály > Okenné kovanie > Okenné rámy: Rámy výklopných okien; Rámy krídlových okien; Dvojité závesné okenné rámy; Rámy pevne zasadených okien; Rámy posuvných okien
pt-BR: Ferragens > Materiais de construção > Ferragens de janelas > Batentes de janelas: Batentes de janelas para toldos; Esquadrias para batentes de janela; Batentes de janela duplas suspensas; Batentes para janelas panorâmicas; Batentes para janelas deslizantes
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Baumaterialien > Fensterbauteile > Fensterrahmen: Markisenfensterrahmen; Flügelfensterrahmen; Rahmen für doppelflügelige Fenster; Bildfensterrahmen; Schiebefensterrahmen
fr: Quincaillerie > Matériaux de construction > Équipements pour fenêtres > Encadrements de fenêtre: Cadres de fenêtres à auvent; Cadres de fenêtres à battants; Cadres de fenêtres à guillotine double; Cadres de fenêtres panoramiques; Cadres de fenêtres coulissantes
pt-PT: Equipamento > Materiais de construção > Equipamento de janelas > Estruturas de janela: Estruturas de janela de toldo; Estruturas de janela de batente; Estruturas de janela duplas suspensas; Estruturas de janelas panorâmicas; Estruturas de janela deslizantes
en: Hardware > Building Materials > Window Hardware > Window Frames: Awning Window Frames; Casement Window Frames; Double Hung Window Frames; Picture Window Frames; Sliding Window Frames
es: Bricolaje > Materiales de construcción > Herrajes para ventanas > Marcos de ventanas: Marcos de ventanas para toldos; Marcos de ventanas abatibles; Marcos de ventanas de doble guillotina; Marcos de ventanas de cuarterones; Marcos de ventanas corredizas
hu: Hardver > Építőanyagok > Ablakhardver > Ablakkeretek: Napellenző ablakkeretek; Lengő ablakkeretek; Duplán függesztett ablakkeretek; Kép ablakkeretek; Csúszó ablakkeretek
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Οικοδομικά υλικά > Υλικά παραθύρων > Κουφώματα παραθύρων: Κουφώματα ανοιγόμενων παράθυρων; Κουφώματα ανοιγόμενων παραθύρων πλευρικής στήριξης; Κουφώματα διπλών ανακλινόμενων παραθύρων; Κουφώματα σταθερών παραθύρων; Κουφώματα συρόμενων παραθύρων
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Statybinės medžiagos > Langų furnitūra > Langų rėmai: Pakreipiamų langų rėmai; Sąvarinių langų rėmai; Dviejų dalių vertikaliai stumdomų langų rėmai; Vitrininių langų rėmai; Stumdomi langų rėmai
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 建材 > 窗户五金 > 窗框: 遮阳窗窗框; 平开窗窗框; 双悬窗窗框; 观景窗窗框; 推拉窗窗框
tr: Hırdavat > Yapı Malzemeleri > Pencere Hırdavatı > Pencere Kasaları: Tente Pencere Çerçeveleri; Kanatlı Pencere Çerçeveleri; Çift Açılır Pencere Çerçeveleri; Resim Pencere Çerçeveleri; Sürgülü Pencere Çerçeveleri
hr-HR: Željezarija > Građevinski materijali > Okovi za prozore > Prozorski okviri: Okviri za otklopne prozore; Okviri za prozore sa šarkama; Okviri za verikalno klizne prozore; Okviri za panoramske prozore; Okviri za klizne prozore
fi: Rakentaminen > Rakennusmateriaalit > Ikkunoiden metalliosat > Ikkunakarmit: Markiisilliset ikkunakarmit; Saranoidut ikkunakarmit; Kaksiosaiset ikkunakarmit; Yksiosaiset ikkunakarmit; Liukulasioven karmit
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Materiali da costruzione > Materiali per finestre > Telai per finestre: Telai per finestre per tende da sole; Infissi per finestre a battente; Infissi a doppia anta; Cornici per finestre; Infissi per finestre scorrevoli
nb: Maskinvare > Bygningsmaterialer > Vindusmateriell > Vindusrammer: Markisevindusrammer; Omrammende vindusrammer; Dobbelthengte vindusrammer; Bildevindusrammer; Skyvevindusrammer
ko: 철물 > 건축 자재 > 창문 설비 > 창틀: 들창 창틀; 여닫이 창틀; 위아래 미닫이 창틀; 고정창틀; 미닫이 창틀
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Gradbeni materiali > Okovje za okna > Okenski okvirji: Okenski okvirji za nagibna okna; Okenski okvirji za okna z bočnim krilom; Okenski okvirji za dvokrilna okna; Okenski okvirji za panoramska okna; Okvirji za drsna okna
zh-TW: 硬體 > 建材 > 窗戶五金配件 > 窗框: 遮陽篷窗框; 平開窗框; 雙懸窗框; 圖片窗框; 橫拉式窗框
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Stavební materiály > Okenní příslušenství > Okenní rámy: Rámy pro vyklápěcí okna; Rámy pro křídlová okna; Rámy pro posuvná okna (nahoru výsuvná okna); Rámy pro okna otevíraná ven; Rámy pro posuvná okna (do boku posuvná okna)
ro-RO: Feronerie > Materiale de construcții > Elemente de feronerie pentru ferestre > Cadre fereastră: Cadre fereastră tip copertină; Cadre batante pentru fereastră; Cadre duble pentru fereastră; Cadre fereastră tip ramă; Cadre fereastră glisante
vi: Phần cứng > Vật liệu xây dựng > Phụ tùng cửa sổ > Khung cửa sổ: Khung cửa sổ mái hiên; Khung cửa sổ hai cánh; Khung cửa sổ treo đôi; Khung cửa sổ kiểu Ve-ne-xi; Khung cửa sổ trượt ngang
da: Isenkram > Byggematerialer > Vinduesdele > Vindueskarme: Vindueskarme med markise; Vindueskarme med casement; Dobbelthængte vindueskarme; Billedvindueskarme; Skydevindueskarme
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Afbouwmaterialen > Raambeslag > Raamkozijnen: Uitzetraamkozijnen; Draairaamkozijnen; Verticaal schuifraam-kozijnen; Vast raam-kozijnen; Horizontaal schuifraam-kozijnen
pl: Sprzęt > Materiały budowlane > Osprzęt okienny > Ramy okienne: Ramy do okien o górnej osi obrotu; Ramy do okien kwaterowych; Ramy do okien z podwójnym zawieszeniem; Ramy do okien panoramicznych; Ramy do okien przesuwnych
sv: Metallprodukter > Byggnadsmaterial > Metalldelar och -beslag till fönster > Fönsterkarmar: Markisfönsterramar; Bågfönsterramar; Dubbelhängda fönsterramar; Bildfönsterramar; Skjutbara fönsterramar
bg-BG: Железария > Строителни материали > Обков за прозорци > Рамки за прозорци: Рамки за прозорци с горно окачване; Рамки за прозорци със странично окачване; Рамки за прозорци с двойно окачване; Рамки за панорамни прозорци; Рамки за плъзгащи се прозорци
ja: DIY用品 > 建築材料 > 窓用品・取付金具 > 窓枠: オーニング窓枠; 開き窓枠; 上げ下げ窓枠; ピクチャーウィンドウフレーム; スライディング窓枠